Nebraska, session 109, LB1068.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1068 LB1068
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 32-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-101 Sections 32-101 to 32-1552 and section 5 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Election Act.
Sec. 2. Section 32-628, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-628 (1) All petitions prepared or filed pursuant to the Election
Act or any petition which requires the Secretary of State, election
commissioner, or county clerk to verify signatures by utilizing the voter
registration register shall provide a space at least two and one-half
inches long for written signatures, a space at least two inches long for
printed names, and sufficient space for date of birth and street name and
number, city or village, and zip code. Lines on each petition shall not
be less than one-fourth inch apart. Petitions may be designed in such a
manner that lines for signatures and other information run the length of
the page rather than the width. Petitions shall provide for no more than
twenty signatures per page.
(2) For the purpose of preventing fraud, deception, and
misrepresentation, every sheet of every petition containing signatures
shall have upon it, above the signatures, the statements contained in
this subsection, except that a petition for recall of an elected official
shall also have the additional information specified in subsection (2) of
section 32-1304. The statements shall be printed in boldface type in
substantially the following form:
WARNING TO PETITION SIGNERS—VIOLATION OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
PROVISIONS OF LAW MAY RESULT IN THE FILING OF CRIMINAL CHARGES: Any
person who signs any name other than his or her own to any petition or
who is not qualified to sign the petition shall be guilty of a Class I
misdemeanor. Any person who falsely swears to a circulator's affidavit on
a petition, who accepts money or other things of value for signing a
petition, or who offers money or other things of value in exchange for a
-2-

LB1068 LB1068
2026 2026
signature upon any petition shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
(3) Every sheet of a petition which contains signatures shall have
upon it, below the signatures, an affidavit as provided in this
subsection, except that the affidavit for a petition for recall of an
elected official shall also include the additional language specified in
subsection (3) of section 32-1304. The affidavit shall be in
substantially the following form:
STATE OF NEBRASKA )
)ss.
COUNTY OF ....... )
..........................., (name of circulator) being first duly
sworn, deposes and says that he or she is the circulator of this petition
containing .......... signatures, that he or she is at least eighteen
years of age, is a United States citizen, and has never pleaded guilty
to, pleaded nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of a felony or
criminal offense involving fraud, forgery, or identification theft, that
each person whose name appears on the petition personally signed the
petition in the presence of the affiant, that the date to the left of
each signature is the correct date on which the signature was affixed to
the petition and that the date was personally affixed by the person
signing such petition, that the affiant believes that each signer has
written his or her name, street and number or voting precinct, and city,
village, or post office address correctly, that the affiant believes that
each signer was qualified to sign the petition, and that the affiant
stated to each signer the object of the petition as printed on the
petition before he or she affixed his or her signature to the petition.
Circulator ...........................
Address ..............................
Subscribed and sworn to before me, a notary public, this ...... day
of ......... 20.... at ..............., Nebraska.
Notary Public ...........................
-3-

LB1068 LB1068
2026 2026
(4) Each sheet of a petition shall have upon its face and in plain
view of persons who sign the petition a statement in letters not smaller
than sixteen-point type in red print on the petition. If the petition is
circulated by a paid circulator, the statement shall be as follows: This
petition is circulated by a paid circulator. If the petition is
circulated by a circulator who is not being paid, the statement shall be
as follows: This petition is circulated by a volunteer circulator.
Sec. 3. Section 32-629, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-629 For any petition prepared or filed pursuant to the Election
Act:
(1) Each petition signer shall be a registered voter and qualified
to sign a petition at the time of signing a petition, except that a
signer of a petition for President of the United States, a candidate
petition, a new political party petition, or an initiative or referendum
petition under sections 32-1401 to 32-1409 shall be a registered voter of
the State of Nebraska on or before the date on which the petition is
filed with the filing officer; and
(2) Only a person who is at least eighteen years of age, is a
citizen of the United States, and has never pleaded guilty to, pleaded
nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of a felony or criminal offense
involving fraud, forgery, or identification theft shall qualify as a
valid circulator of a petition and may circulate petitions. Any sheet of
a petition circulated by a person who does not qualify as a valid
circulator pursuant to this subdivision shall be invalid. Petition
circulators shall comply with section 32-630.
Sec. 4. Section 32-630, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-630 (1) Each person who signs a petition shall, at the time of
and in addition to signing, personally affix the date, print his or her
last name and first name in full, and affix his or her date of birth and
-4-

LB1068 LB1068
2026 2026
address, including the street and number or a designation of a rural
route or voting precinct and the city or village or a post office
address. A person signing a petition may use his or her initials in place
of his or her first name if such person is registered to vote under such
initials.
(2) Each circulator of a petition shall wear an identification badge
that states such circulator's name, shall personally witness the
signatures on the petition, and shall sign the circulator's affidavit.
(3) No person shall:
(a) Sign any name other than his or her own to any petition;
(b) Knowingly sign his or her name more than once for the same
petition effort or measure;
(c) Sign a petition if he or she is not a registered voter and
qualified to sign the same except as provided in subdivision (1) of
section 32-629;
(d) Falsely swear to any signature upon any such petition;
(e) Accept money or other thing of value for signing any petition;
or
(f) Offer money or other thing of value in exchange for a signature
upon any petition.
Sec. 5. (1) Prior to circulating a petition, the sponsor of the
petition shall:
(a) File with the Secretary of State a list of the names of
circulators of the petition who will be handling more than twenty-five
sheets of such petition. The sponsor shall update the list at the time
petitions are presented to the election commissioner or county clerk for
signature verification to include any additional circulator that has
circulated more than twenty-five sheets of such petition; and
(b) File with the Secretary of State an explanation of how the
circulators of the petition will comply with the identification badge
requirement in subsection (2) of section 32-630.
-5-

LB1068 LB1068
2026 2026
(2) Every paid circulator of a petition shall be subject to a
criminal background check by the sponsor of the petition to ensure
compliance with subdivision (2) of section 32-629.
Sec. 6. Original sections 32-101, 32-628, 32-629, and 32-630,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-6-